North Dakota, session 69, HB1266.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 57-02-08.8 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
57-02-08.8. Property tax credit for disabled veterans - Certification - Distribution.
1. A disabled veteran of the United States armed forces with an armed forces
service-connected disability of fifty percent or greater or a disabled veteran who has
an extra-schedular rating to include individual unemployability that brings the veteran's
total disability rating to one hundred percent as determined by the department of
veterans' affairs, who was discharged under honorable conditions or who has been
retired from the armed forces of the United States, or the surviving spouse if the
disabled veteran is deceased, is eligible for a credit applied against the first eight
thousand one hundrednine thousand dollars of taxable valuation of the homestead
owned and occupied by the disabled veteran or surviving spouse equal to the
percentage of the disabled veteran's disability compensation rating for
service-connected disabilities as certified by the department of veterans' affairs for the
purpose of applying for a property tax credit. A surviving spouse who is receiving
United States department of veterans affairs dependency and indemnity compensation
receives a one hundred percent credit as described in this subsection. If the
determination of disability or service-connected death occurs subsequent to the
qualifying veteran's death through application of a law that renders a surviving spouse
Page No. 1 25.0623.02000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
of a qualifying veteran eligible for United States department of veterans affairs
disability and indemnity compensation, the determination for purposes of the credit
under this subsection is presumed to precede the veteran's death. Sufficient proof of
receipt of United States department of veterans affairs dependency and indemnity
compensation includes correspondence directed to a surviving spouse of a qualifying
veteran by the United States department of veterans affairs which indicates the
surviving spouse is a survivor of the qualifying veteran and is in receipt of United
States department of veterans affairs dependency and indemnity compensation.
2. If two disabled veterans are married to each other and living together, their combined
credits may not exceed one hundred percent of eight thousand one hundrednine
thousand dollars of taxable valuation of the homestead. If a disabled veteran co-owns
the homestead property with someone other than the disabled veteran's spouse,
parent, or child, the credit is limited to that disabled veteran's interest in the
homestead, to a maximum amount calculated by multiplying eight thousand
one hundred dollars ofthe taxable valuation byof the disabled veteran's percentage of
interest in the homestead property and multiplying the result by the applicant's certified
disability percentage , not to exceed the maximum credit amount in subsection 1 .
3. A disabled veteran or unremarried surviving spouse claiming a credit under this
section for the first time shall file with the county auditor an affidavit showing the facts
required under this section, a description of the property, and a certificate from the
United States department of veterans' affairs, or its successor, certifying to the amount
of the disability. The affidavit and certificate must be open for public inspection. A
person shall thereafter furnish to the assessor or other assessment officials, when
requested to do so, any information which supports the claim for credit for any
subsequent year.
4. For purposes of this section, and except as otherwise provided in this section,
"homestead":
a. "Child" means a child by birth, adoption, or marriage.
b. "Homestead" has the meaning provided in section 47-18-01 except that it also
applies to a person who otherwise qualifies under the provisions of this section
whether the person is the head of the family.
Page No. 2 25.0623.02000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
c. "Parent" means a birth parent, adoptive parent, or stepparent.
5. This section does not reduce the liability of a person for special assessments levied
upon property.
6. A credit under this section terminates at the end of the taxable year of the death of the
applicant.
7. The board of county commissioners may cancel the portion of unpaid taxes that
represents the credit calculated in accordance with this section for any year in which
the qualifying owner has held title to the homestead property. Cancellation of taxes for
any year before enactment of this section must be based on the law that was in effect
for that tax year.
8. Before the first of March of each year, the county auditor of each county shall certify to
the tax commissioner on forms prescribed by the tax commissioner the name and
address of each person for whom the property tax credit for homesteads of disabled
veterans was allowed for the preceding year, the amount of credit allowed, the total of
the tax mill rates of all taxing districts, exclusive of any state mill rates, that was
applied to other real estate in the taxing districts for the preceding year, and such other
information as may be prescribed by the tax commissioner.
9. On or before the first of June of each year, the tax commissioner shall audit the
certifications, make the required corrections, and certify to the state treasurer for
payment to each county the sum of the amounts computed by multiplying the credit
allowed for each homestead of a disabled veteran in the county by the total of the tax
mill rates, exclusive of any state mill rates that were applied to other real estate in the
taxing districts for the preceding year.
10. The county treasurer upon receipt of the payment from the state treasurer shall
apportion and distribute the payment without delay to the county and to the local
taxing districts of the county on the basis on which the general real estate tax for the
preceding year is apportioned and distributed.
11. On or before the first day of June of each year, the tax commissioner shall certify to
the state treasurer the amount computed by multiplying the property tax credit allowed
under this section for homesteads of disabled veterans in the state for the preceding
year by one mill for deposit in the state medical center fund.
Page No. 3 25.0623.02000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
12. Supplemental certifications by the county auditor and by the tax commissioner and
supplemental payments by the state treasurer may be made after the dates prescribed
in this section to make such corrections as may be necessary because of errors or
because of approval of an application for abatement filed by a person because the
credit provided for the homestead of a disabled veteran was not allowed in whole or in
part.
SECTION 2. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act is effective for taxable years beginning after
December 31, 2024.
Page No. 4 25.0623.02000